Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-324
Department; voluntary application for admission.

The Department of Health and Human Services may accept patients for care and treatment upon the written application of a patient. Such written application may be made by persons desiring to receive care and treatment in one of the state hospitals for the mentally ill to the chief executive officer of the state hospital in which the patient wishes to receive treatment.

Laws 1905, c. 82, § 3, p. 387;

R.S.1913, § 7283;

C.S.1922, § 6939;

C.S.1929, § 83-744;

R.S.1943, § 83-324;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 15, p. 1060;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 17, p. 3121;

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 88;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 224;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 132;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 787.

Application for admission as a dipsomaniac must be in writing in the nature of an information and verified by affidavit. In re Application of Cupita, 148 Neb. 555, 28 N.W.2d 149 (1947).